Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1842
Sexual assault victim; records; confidential.

The name of any victim of a sexual assault appearing in information or records of the Crime Victim's Reparations Committee when the victim is applying for compensation under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act shall not be made public.

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 37.